Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-1214
Case managers; training program; department; duties; training curriculum; contents.

To facilitate consistency in training all case managers and allow for Title IV-E reimbursement for case manager training under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, the same program for initial training of case managers shall be utilized for all case managers. The initial training of all case managers shall be provided by the department or one or more organizations under contract with the department. The department shall create a formal system for measuring and evaluating the quality of such training. All case managers shall complete a formal assessment process after initial training to demonstrate competency prior to assuming responsibilities as a case manager. The training curriculum for case managers shall include, but not be limited to: (1) An understanding of the benefits of utilizing evidence-based and promising casework practices; (2) the importance of guaranteeing service providers' fidelity to evidence-based and promising casework practices; and (3) a commitment to evidence-based and promising family-centered casework practices that utilize a least restrictive approach for children and families.

Laws 2014, LB853, § 45;

Laws 2022, LB1173, § 19.